Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.040

Family services and programs—Administration.

The secretary shall administer family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 107.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.